src/phonology/bxr-phon.twolc
!! !!!Buryaad morphophonology

!! This file expresses Buryaad morphophonological alternation, from abstract underlying forms.

!! !!!Alphabet

!! This is a list of all symbols in use.

Alphabet

А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О   !!= * @CODE@ 
Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ы   !!=   @CODE@  
Ъ Э Ю Я							  !!=   @CODE@ = Capital letters
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о   !!= * @CODE@ 
ө п р с т у ү ф х һ ц ч ш щ ь ы   !!=   @CODE@
ъ э ю я							  !!=   @CODE@ = Small letters
%{A%}:а %{A%}:о %{A%}:э			  !!= * @CODE@ = archivowel A
%{A%}:я %{A%}:ё %{A%}:е			  !!= * @CODE@ = archivowel A
%{U%}:у %{U%}:ү  				  !!= * @CODE@ = archivowel U
%{Ө%}:а %{Ө%}:о %{Ө%}:э %{Ө%}:ө	  !!= * @CODE@ = archivowel Ө 
%{I%}:и %{I%}:ы %{I%}:0			  !!= * @CODE@ = archivowel I
%{Y%}:и %{Y%}:0              !!= * @CODE@ = archivowel Y, kept after Cns, deleted after Vow
%{D%}:т %{D%}:д					  !!= * @CODE@ = arciconsonant D

%> 		        !!= * @CODE@ = suffix border
а2:а я2:я       !!= * @CODE@ = invariant а/я in loanwords
м2:м       !!= * @CODE@ = м to be deleted for PxSg1
%^END:0	        !!= * @CODE@ = auxiliary end symbol to fix xerox bug
 ;

!! !!!Sets

!! Some of the symbols are bundled together in sets

Sets
RealVow =  А Е Ё И О Ө У Ү Ы Э Ю Я			  !!= * @CODE@ 
           а е ё и о ө у ү ы э ю я ;		  !!=   @CODE@ 
ArchiVow = а2 %{A%} %{U%} %{Ө%} %{I%} %{Y%} ; !!= * @CODE@ 
RealCns =  Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т	  !!= * @CODE@ 
           Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ъ				  !!=   @CODE@ 
           б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т	  !!=   @CODE@ 
           ф х һ ц ч ш щ ь ъ ;				  !!=   @CODE@ 
ArchiCns = %{D%} ;							  !!= * @CODE@ 

Vow = RealVow ArchiVow ;  !!= * @CODE@ 
Cns = RealCns ArchiCns ;  !!= * @CODE@ 
Sgm = Vow Cns ;			  !!= * @CODE@ 


!! !!!Rules

!! Here come all the rules (marked with RULE:), and test cases.

Rules

!! !!Vowel harmony
!! !Vowel harmony for short vowels

"Vowel harmony A:а"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ gives a after stems with a or juu
%{A%}:а <=> .#. ~$[е|ё|э|о|ү|ө] [:а|:я|:у] [(Cns (и) и) RealCns:|ю (у)|ы|а:]* %> [(Cns:* - й:) (%{A%}:)]*       _  ;
            .#. ~$[е|ё|э|о|ү|ө] [:а|:я|:у] RealCns (и) и:          %> :я [(Cns:* - й:) (%{A%}:)]*    _  ; 
            .#. ~$[е|ё|э|о|ү|ө] [:а|:я|:у] RealCns:+ (и) и         %> [Cns:+ - й:] (%{A%}:)               _  ; ! бари>х{A}
            .#. ~$[е|ё|э|о|ү|ө] [:а|:я|:у] (RealCns (и) [и|а])     %> [Cns:+ - й:] (%{A%}:) й: (%{A%}:) %{A%}: _  ; ! бари>х{A}
            .#. ~$[е|ё|э|о|ү|ө] [:а|:я|:у] RealCns (и) и           %> [Cns:+ - й:]  %{A%}:  л  (%{A%}:) _  ; ! бари>х{A}

!@ б а с а г а н >:0 г:0 {A}:а й
!!€ басаган>г{A}й
!!€ басаган>0ай

!!€ бари>х{A}л{A}{A}р
!!€ бари>халаар

"Vowel harmony A:я"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ gives я after stems with a or juu
%{A%}:я <=> [:а|:я|\ю у] [RealCns:|ю (у)|ы|(и) и|:0]* %> [(Cns:* - й:) (%{A%}:)]* й: _ ;
            [:а|:я|\ю у]  RealCns      (и) и:         %>                _ ;
            [:а|:я|\ю у]  RealCns  (и)  [а|и]         %> :Cns %{A%}: й: _ ;

!!€ хара>х{A}й{A}{A}
!!€ хара>ха0яа
!!€ бари>х{A}й{A}{A}
!!€ бари>ха0яа


"Vowel harmony A:o"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ gives o after stems with o or jo
%{A%}:о <=> [о|ё] [RealCns:|ю (у)|ы|ё]* (о:) %> [(Cns:* - й:) (%{A%}:)]* _  ;
            [о|ё]  RealCns:+ (и) и: ([л|р]) (о:) %> [(Cns:* - й:) (%{A%}:)]* _  ; ! орхи>х{A}^END
            [о|ё]  RealCns (и) и:              %> :ё _  ; 
            
!!€ самолёт>{D}{A}^END
!!€ самолёд>то0

"Vowel harmony A:э"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ gives e after e etc
%{A%}:э <=> [э|е|ү|ө ө] [RealCns:|ю (у)|ы|и|е|э:]* %> [(Cns:* - й:) (%{A%}:)]* _ ;
            .#. Cns:* и и RealCns:* (ы)            %> [(Cns:* - й:) (%{A%}:)]* _ ;
            .#. Cns:* ю   RealCns:+ (ы)            %> [(Cns:* - й:) (%{A%}:)]* _ ;
            [э|е|ү|ө ө]  RealCns (и) и:            %> :е                       _ ;
	                                о в а л э: %>  х                       _ ;
            
!@ б а с а г а н >:0 г:0 {A}:а й
!!€ басаган>г{A}й
!!€ басаган>0ай

!!€ бэелэ>х{A}^END
!!€ бэел0>хэ0

!!€ автоматизировалэ>х{A}
!!€ автоматизировал0>хэ

"Vowel harmony A:ё"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ gives ё after stems with o or jo
%{A%}:ё <=> [о|ё]       [RealCns:|ю (у)|ы|(и) и]*  %> й: _  ;

!!€ самолёт>{D}{A}^END
!!€ самолёд>то0

"Vowel harmony A:е"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ gives е after e etc and preceeding 
%{A%}:е <=> [э|е|ү|ө ө] [RealCns:|ю (у)|ы|(и) и]*  %> й: _  ;

"Vowel harmony й:0"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ deletes й in front of A
й:0 <=>  %> RealCns:* (%{A%}:) _ %{A%}: ;


"Vowel harmony U:у"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ gives a after stems with a or juu
%{U%}:у <=> [:а|:я|\ю у]  [RealCns:|ю (у)|ы|(и) и|:0]*  %> (Cns:) (%{U%}:) _  ;


"Vowel harmony U:ү"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ gives e after e etc
%{U%}:ү <=> [э|е|ү|ө ө] [RealCns:|ю (у)|ы|(и) и]*  %> (Cns:) (%{U%}:) _  ;



!! !Vowel harmony for long vowels

"Vowel harmony ӨӨ:аa"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ gives aa after a
%{Ө%}:а <=> .#. ~$[э|ө|ү] [а|у|о] :RealCns* и:* %> ([:RealCns|:RealVow]*  %>:) һ ( %{Ө%}: ) _  ;

!!€ анг>һ{Ө}{Ө}^END
!!€ анг>һаа0

!!€ аха>һ{Ө}{Ө}^END
!!€ аха>һаа0

"Vowel harmony ӨӨ:оо"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ gives oo after o
%{Ө%}:о <=> .#. ~$[э|ө|ү] о :RealCns* и:* %> ([:RealCns|:RealVow]*  %>:) һ ( %{Ө%}: ) _  ;

"Vowel harmony ӨӨ:ээ"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ gives ee after e
%{Ө%}:э <=> .#. ~$[а|о|ө|у] э :RealCns* и:* %> ([:RealCns|:RealVow]*  %>:) һ ( %{Ө%}: ) _  ;

"Vowel harmony ӨӨ:өө"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ gives ø after ø
%{Ө%}:ө <=> .#. ~$[а|о|у|э] ө :RealCns* и:* %> ([:RealCns|:RealVow - а]*  %>:) һ ( %{Ө%}: ) _  ;



!! !Realisation of I as ы and и

"{I}{I} to ы in Gen/Acc and Poss 1"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ gives y for the first I
%{I%}:ы <=> [а:|э:|о:|:RealCns] %> _ %{I%}: [н|е] [%^END:|%>:] ; !Gen/Acc
                          н:    %> _ %{I%}:     е [%^END:|%>:] ; !Gen/Acc
                     [Cns - н]  %> _ %{I%}: н ь ;  
                    
"{I}{I} to ы in Gen/Acc and Poss 2"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ deletes the second I
%{I%}:0 <=> [а:|э:|о:|:RealCns] %> %{I%}: _ [н|е] [%^END:|%>:] ; !Gen/Acc
                          н:    %> %{I%}: _        е [%^END:|%>:] ; !Gen/Acc
!                          н:    %>        _ %{I%}: е [%^END:|%>:] ; !Gen/Acc
                     [Cns - н]  %> %{I%}: _ н ь ;   
                     RealVow    %> %{I%}: _ н ь ;
                     RealVow    %>        _ %{I%}: н ь ;


!!€ Байгал>{I}{I}нь^END
!!€ Байгал>ы0нь0

!!€ аба>{I}{I}нь^END
!!€ аба>00нь0

!!€ аба>{I}{I}е^END
!!€ аб0>ы0е0

"{I}{I} to ии in Gen/Acc and Poss"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ changes both I to i
%{I%}:и <=>  и: %>          _ %{I%}: [н | е] [%^END:|%>:] ;
             и: %>   %{I%}: _        [н | е] [%^END:|%>:] ;
             н  %>          _ %{I%}: н ь ; ! Poss
             н  %>   %{I%}: _        н ь ; ! Poss
        RealVow %> н        _ %{I%}: н ь ; ! Poss
        RealVow %> н %{I%}: _        н ь ; ! Poss

!!€ морин>{I}{I}нь^END
!!€ морин>иинь0

! морин>{I}{I}е>тнай
! мори0>и .. fill in with correct form


!"Stem vowel deletion"
!Vx:0 <=> _ %> :а :а ; ![%^END:|%>:] ; 
!      where Vx in ( и э а о ) ; 

!! !!Other vowel rules
!! !Vowel deletion rules

"Final stem vowel deletion before ые and ын"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ 
Vx:0 <=> :RealCns _ %> [:ы (:0) [н|е]|:а :а|:о :о|:э :э|:ө :ө] ;
    RealVow [RealCns+ RealVow|я|е|ё|ю] ([RealVow|й]) [р|л] _ %> RealCns ;
     where Vx in ( а о э ) ;

!!€ аха>{A}{A}р^END
!!€ ах0>аар0

"Deletion of и in word-final иие and Deletion SHV and Vowel harmony и:0"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ 
и:0 <=>       _ н %> е %{A%}: р ;
        и %> _ :и е ;
             _ %> %{A%}: ; ! deletes и in front of A initial suffix
             _ %> %{I%}: %{I%}: ;

!!€ бари>{A}{A}    
!!€ бар0>яа


!!€ һургуули>{I}{I}н^END
!!€ һургуул0>иин0


"Deletion of ы in -ые for aj and VV stems"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ 
ы:0 <=> [ а й | а а| о о |э э ] %> _  :е  ;

"Deletion of Y in predicative particle -b for vowel stem"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ 
%{Y%}:0 <=> :RealVow %> б _ ;

!!€ би>б{Y}^END
!!€ би>б00

!! !Vowel change rules

"Y to i in predicative particle -bi for consonant stem"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ 
%{Y%}:и <=> :RealCns %> б _ ;

!!€ тэдэнэр>б{Y}^END
!!€ тэдэнэр>би0

!! !!Consonant rules
!! !Consonant change rules

"D to t suffix initially for VC stems"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ 
%{D%}:т <=> :RealVow [б|г|р|с|:д] %> _ ;
!%{D%}:т <=> [б|г|р|с|д|т] %> _ ;

!!€ сэсэг>{D}{A}^END
!!€ сэсэг>тэ0

"D to d after n i l"  ! check
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ 
%{D%}:д <=> [н (г:)|л|й|:RealVow] %> _ ;



"Final consonant ptd voicing to bdg in loanwords"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ 
[п:б|т:д|к:г] <=> RealVow _ %> [Vow|:Cns] ;

!!€ самолёт>{A}й^END
!!€ самолёд>ой0


!! !Consonant deletion rules

"Deletion of possessive м2 for consonant stems"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ 
м2:0 <=> [Cns: - [н:|й:]] %> _ .#. ;

"Deletion of n before m in possessive and before gAAr"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ 
н:0 <=>         RealVow _ %> м н и ;
        RealVow RealVow _ %> г %{A%}: %{A%}: р ;
        RealVow RealVow _ %> %{I%}: %{I%}: е ;

!!€ һанаан>{I}{I}е^END
!!€ һанаа0>ы0е0

!"Буква д после гласных"
! д:д <=> RealVow %> _ ;


! Always delete /g/ in affix if there anything apart from /n/

"Deletion of g in word-final ng and before gaj and haa"
!! * RULE:  __@RULENAME@__ 
г:0 <=>        н _ [%>:  [:Cns - :һ] | %^END:] ;
        Cns: %> _ [ %{A%}: [%{A%}: р|й] | һ %{Ө%}: %{Ө%}: ] ;

!@ б а с а г а н >:> г:0 {A}:а й
!@ б а с а г а н >:> г:0 һ {A}:а {A}:а 

!!€ анг>{D}{A}^END
!!€ ан0>да0

!!€ анг>һ{Ө}{Ө}^END 
!!€ анг>һаа0

!!€ ури>н{A}>б
!!€ ури>на>б

!!€ амила>х{A}^END
!!€ амил0>ха0

!!€ боли>х{A}^END
!!€ боли>хо0

!!€ дохи>х{A}^END
!!€ дохи>хо0

!!€ зори>х{A}^END
!!€ зори>хо0

!!€ орхи>х{A}^END
!!€ орхи>хо0

!!€ долгил>х{A}^END
!!€ долгил>хо0

!!€ хушажархи>х{A}^END
!!€ хушажархи>ха0

!!€ орило>х{A}^END
!!€ орил0>хо0

!!€ доһоло>х{A}^END
!!€ доһол0>хо0

!!€ гэршэлэ>х{A}^END
!!€ гэршэл0>хэ0

!!€ һуу>х{A}й{A}{A}
!!€ һуу>ха0яа



! This magic spell in order to show make check output also when everything passes:
!!€ т е с т р а б о т а е т
!!€ в т е с т е о ш и б к а



!"Floating vowel"
!и:ё <=> :Cns _ н %> () ;



!"{I} to и in Acc case"
!%{I%}:и <=> 
